Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4418
Purchasing group; purchase of insurance; authorized; when.

(1) A purchasing group shall not purchase insurance from a risk retention group that is not chartered and licensed in a state or from an insurer not admitted in the state in which the purchasing group is located, unless the purchase is effected through a licensed agent or broker acting pursuant to the surplus lines laws, rules, and regulations of such state, except that such licensed agent or broker need not be a resident of this state.

(2) A purchasing group which obtains liability insurance from an insurer not admitted in this state or from a risk retention group shall inform each of the members of the purchasing group which have a risk resident or located in this state that such risk is not protected by an insurance insolvency guaranty fund in this state and that such risk retention group or such insurer may not be subject to all insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state.

(3) No purchasing group may purchase insurance providing for a deductible or self-insured retention applicable to the group as a whole, but coverage may provide for a deductible or self-insured retention applicable to individual members.

(4) Purchases of insurance by purchasing groups are subject to the same standards regarding aggregate limits which are applicable to all purchases of group insurance.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 55.